en: Nazca potatoes
da: Nazca-kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre Nazca

en: Red potatoes
da: Røde kartofler
fr: Pommes de terres rouges
nl: Rode aardappelen

en: Potatoes for steaming
da: Kartofler til dampning
es: Patatas para cocinar al vapor
fr: Pommes de terre vapeur, Pommes de terre spéciales vapeur
hr: Krumpir za kuhanje na pari

en: Potatoes for gratin
da: Kartofler til gratin
fr: Pomme de terre gratin

en: Potatoes for hash browns, hashed brown potatoes, hashed browned potatoes
fr: Pommes de terre pour pommes de terre rissolées

en: Potatoes for raclette
fr: Pommes de terre raclette

fr: Pommes de terre farineuses
nl: Kruimige aardappelen

en: Potatoes from Italy, Italian potatoes
da: Kartofler fra Italien, Italienske kartofler
de: Kartoffeln aus Italien
fr: Pommes de terre d'Italie
hr: Krompir iz italije
nl: Aardappelen uit Italië
sv: Potatis från Italien

en: Potatoes from Fucino
da: Kartofler fra Fucino
it: Patata del Fucino

en: Potatoes from Sila
da: Kartofler fra Sila
it: Patata della Sila

en: Potatoes from Alto Viterbese
da: Kartofler fra Alto Viterbese
it: Patata dell'Alto Viterbese

en: Potatoes from Spain, Spanish potatoes
da: Kartofler fra Spanien, Spanske kartofler
de: Kartoffeln aus Spanien
fr: Pommes de terre d'Espagne
hr: Krumpir iz Španjolske
nl: Aardappelen uit Spanje
sv: Potatis från Spanien

en: Potatoes from Val de Picones
da: Kartofler fra Val de Picones
de: Kartoffeln aus Val de Picones
fr: Pommes de terre de Val de Picones
hr: Krumpir iz val de picones
nl: Aardappelen uit Val de Picones

en: Potatoes from France, French potatoes
da: Kartofler fra Frankrig, Franske kartofler
de: Kartoffeln aus Frankreich
fr: Pommes de terre françaises
hr: Krumpir iz Francuske
nl: Aardappelen uit Frankrijk, Franse aardappelen
sv: Potatis från Frankrike

en: Potatoes from Île de Ré
da: Kartofler fra Île de Ré
fr: Pommes de terre de l'île de Ré, Pomme de terre de l'île de Ré

en: Potatoes from Noirmoutier
da: Kartofler fra Noirmoutier
fr: Pomme de terre de Noirmoutier

en: Potatoes from Merville
da: Kartofler fra Merville
fr: Pommes de terre de Merville

en: Squash
fr: Courge
hr: Skvoš
ja: スクワッシュ

en: Squash pulp, Cucurbita moschata pulp
fr: Pulpe de courge musquée, Courge musquée

en: Pumpkin pulp
fr: Pulpe de citrouille